District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.05

Appointments to vacancies.

When a vacancy develops on the Commission, the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council of the District of Columbia may appoint a successor to fill the unexpired portion of the term. A member may continue to serve beyond the expiration date of the member’s term until a successor is duly qualified. If within 30 calendar days of development of a vacancy on the Commission the Mayor fails to transmit to the Council of the District of Columbia a nomination for that vacancy, the Council of the District of Columbia may make the appointment. If within 60 calendar days of submission of a nomination for the Commission the Council of the District of Columbia fails to act, the nomination shall be deemed confirmed.

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 405, 22 DCR 2461
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-152, § 2, 35 DCR 5704
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 5, 46 DCR 5153
1981 Ed., § 6-2225.
1973 Ed., § 6-1725.
D.C. Law 13-49 rewrote this section, which previously read:
“The Commission shall consist of 15 public (voting) members appointed by the Mayor. At least one-half of the membership of the Commission shall consist of actual consumers of services under this program, including low income and minority older persons, at least in proportion to the number of minority older persons in the District of Columbia. There shall also be the following ex officio members: The Directors of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Housing and Community Development, the Department of Recreation, the Department of Transportation, the Department of Employment Services, the Public Library, the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department (or the Director or Chief of such successor agencies), and a member of the Council of the District of Columbia.”